Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.100

Livestock inspection—Purchaser's fee.

The licensee of each public livestock market or special open consignment horse sale shall collect from any purchaser of livestock requesting inspection a fee as provided by law for each animal inspected. This fee shall be in addition to the fee charged to the consignor for inspection and shall not apply to the minimum fee chargeable to the licensee.

[ 2003 c 326 s 72; 1983 c 298 s 9; 1959 c 107 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.